Utah statutes.
70A-8-102.   Rules for determining whether certain obligations and interests
are securities or financial assets.
(1)  A share or similar equity interest issued by a corporation, business
trust, joint stock company, or similar entity is a security.
(2)  An "investment company security" is a security.  "Investment company
security" means a share or similar equity interest issued by an entity that is
registered as an investment company under the federal investment company laws,
an interest in a unit investment trust that is so registered, or a face-amount
certificate issued by a face-amount certificate company that is so registered.
Investment company security does not include an insurance policy or endowment
policy or annuity contract issued by an insurance company.
(3)  An interest in a partnership or limited liability company is not a
security unless it is dealt in or traded on securities exchanges or in
securities markets, its terms expressly provide that it is a security governed
by this chapter, or it is an investment company security.  However, an
interest in a partnership or limited liability company is a financial asset if
it is held in a securities account.
(4)  A writing that is a security certificate is governed by this chapter and
not by Chapter 3, Uniform Commercial Code - Negotiable Instruments, even
though it also meets the requirements of that chapter.  However, a negotiable
instrument governed by Chapter 3 is a financial asset if it is held in a
securities account.
(5)  An option or similar obligation issued by a clearing corporation to its
participants is not a security, but is a financial asset.
(6)  A commodity contract, as defined in Subsection 70A-9a-102(15), is not a
security or a financial asset.
(7)  A document of title is not a financial asset unless Subsection
70A-8-101(1)(i)(i)(C) applies.
